Hawaii statutes.
[§604-7.2] Arrest warrants
arising from traffic violations. In any criminal proceeding, due diligence
shall be used in serving any outstanding traffic warrants on the defendant. [L
2006, c 308, §3]

Cross References

See also §353-66.5.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next